Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5735YH (2) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2663 Section 1. STATE BOARD OF REGENTS. There is appropriated 1 from the general fund of the state to the state board of 2 regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 3 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 4 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 5 To support a study at the state university of Iowa on the 6 underlying causes of cancer rates in this state, including 7 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 9 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES. There 10 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 11 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 12 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 13 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 14 purposes designated: 15 To award grants to public or private entities to support 16 clinical cancer research and programs to increase access to 17 clinical cancer research trials for residents of this state: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 19 The department of health and human services may utilize up 20 to five percent of the moneys appropriated in this section for 21 administrative costs associated with awarding grants under this 22 section. 23